Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201885-421
University of Nebraska Facilities Program of 2006; appropriations; legislative intent; projects enumerated; accounting; status reports.

(1) The Legislature shall appropriate from the General Fund (a) an amount not less than five million five hundred thousand dollars for each fiscal year for the period beginning with the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2006, and continuing through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, and (b) an amount not less than eleven million dollars for each fiscal year for the period beginning with the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2009, and continuing through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2030, to the University of Nebraska Facilities Program of 2006 to be used by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska to accomplish projects as provided in this section. Through the allotment process established in section 81-1113, the Department of Administrative Services shall make appropriated funds available. Undisbursed appropriations balances existing in the University of Nebraska Facilities Program of 2006 at the end of each fiscal year until June 30, 2031, shall be and are hereby reappropriated.

(2) The Legislature finds and determines that the projects funded through the University of Nebraska Facilities Program of 2006 are of critical importance to the State of Nebraska. It is the intent of the Legislature that the appropriations to the program shall not be reduced until all contracts and securities relating to the construction and financing of the projects or portions of the projects funded from such funds or accounts of such funds are completed or paid but in no case shall such appropriations extend beyond the fiscal year ending June 30, 2030, nor shall the cumulative total of the General Fund appropriations for the program exceed two hundred forty-seven million five hundred thousand dollars.

(3) Subject to the receipt of project approval from the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education as required by subsection (10) of section 85-1414 for each of the following University of Nebraska projects, the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska is authorized to make expenditures from the University of Nebraska Facilities Program of 2006 for the following projects: (a) Deferred maintenance, repair, and renovation of University of Nebraska at Kearney Bruner Hall; (b) construction of University of Nebraska at Kearney campus-wide central utilities plant and system; (c) construction of facilities to replace University of Nebraska-Lincoln Behlen, Brace, and Ferguson Halls or deferred maintenance, repair, and renovation of University of Nebraska-Lincoln Behlen, Brace, and Ferguson Halls; (d) construction of a facility to replace University of Nebraska-Lincoln Keim Hall or deferred maintenance, repair, and renovation of University of Nebraska-Lincoln Keim Hall; (e) deferred maintenance, repair, and renovation of University of Nebraska-Lincoln Sheldon Memorial Art Gallery; (f) deferred maintenance, repair, and renovation of University of Nebraska-Lincoln Animal Science Complex; (g) deferred maintenance, repair, and renovation of University of Nebraska Medical Center Poynter, Bennet, and Wittson Halls; (h) deferred maintenance, repair, and renovation of University of Nebraska Medical Center Eppley Institute for Research in Cancer and Allied Diseases or replacement if additional federal or private funds are received; (i) deferred maintenance, repair, and renovation of University of Nebraska Medical Center College of Dentistry; (j) deferred maintenance, repair, and renovation of University of Nebraska at Omaha Library; (k) deferred maintenance, repair, and renovation of University of Nebraska at Omaha utilities infrastructure; (l) University of Nebraska-Lincoln Scott Engineering Center; (m) University of Nebraska-Lincoln Nebraska Hall; (n) University of Nebraska-Lincoln Mabel Lee Hall/Henzlik Hall; (o) University of Nebraska Medical Center Wittson Hall-Phase I; (p) University of Nebraska Medical Center Joseph D. & Millie E. Williams Science Hall (College of Pharmacy); (q) renovation of a privately funded acquisition at the University of Nebraska at Omaha; (r) University of Nebraska at Omaha Strauss Performing Arts Center; (s) University of Nebraska at Omaha Arts and Sciences Hall; and (t) University of Nebraska at Kearney Otto C. Olsen Building.

(4) Expenditures of matching funds provided for the projects listed in this section by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska as provided for in section 85-419 shall be accounted for in the Nebraska State Accounting System through the University of Nebraska Facilities Program of 2006 or according to some other reporting process mutually agreed upon by the University of Nebraska and the Department of Administrative Services.

(5) The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska shall record and report, on the Nebraska State Accounting System, expenditure of amounts from the University of Nebraska Facilities Program of 2006 and expenditure of proceeds arising from any contract entered into pursuant to this section and section 85-422 in such manner and format as prescribed by the Department of Administrative Services or according to some other reporting process mutually agreed upon by the University of Nebraska and the Department of Administrative Services.

(6) The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska shall provide to the Task Force for Building Renewal semiannual reports concerning the status of each project authorized by this section.

Laws 2006, LB 605, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB316, § 27;

Laws 2016, LB957, § 16.